Maryland, session 2026, HB1338.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
16–103.
(c) The Administration may not issue:
(1) A learner’s instructional permit to any individual who has not reached
the age of 15 years, 9 months;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1338*

HOUSE BILL 1338
(2) A provisional license to any individual who [has]:
(I) HAS not reached the age of 16 years, 6 months; OR
(II) IS 18 YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER; or
(3) A license to any individual who has not reached the age of 18 years.
16–105.
(d) (1) This subsection applies to an individual who:
(i) Seeks to obtain an original driver’s license under this subtitle;
and
(ii) Does not qualify for a learner’s instructional permit under
subsection (e) of this section.
(2) [Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, an] AN
individual under the age of [19] 18 years who holds a learner’s instructional permit may
not take a driver skills examination or driver road examination for a provisional license:
(i) Sooner than 9 months following the later of:
1. The date that the individual first obtains the learner’s
instructional permit; or
2. The most recent date the individual was convicted of, or
granted probation before judgment under § 6–220 of the Criminal Procedure Article for, a
moving violation;
(ii) Until after successful completion of:
1. The driver education program approved under Subtitle 5
of this title, consisting of at least 30 hours of classroom instruction and at least 6 hours of
highway driving instruction; and
2. At least 60 hours, 10 hours of which must occur during the
period beginning 30 minutes before sunset and ending 30 minutes after sunrise, of
behind–the–wheel driving practice supervised by an individual who:
A. Holds a valid driver’s license;
B. Is at least 21 years old; and
C. Has been licensed to drive for at least 3 years; and

HOUSE BILL 1338 3
(iii) Unless the individual submits, in accordance with the
Administration’s regulations, a completed skills log book signed by:
1. Each supervising driver who certifies that the individual
has satisfactorily demonstrated a required skill and has completed the driving practice
requirements of item (ii)2 of this paragraph; and
2. If a signature of a parent, guardian, or other person is
required under § 16–107 of this subtitle, the parent, guardian, or other person who signs
the individual’s application under that section.
(3) An individual who holds a learner’s instructional permit and who is AT
LEAST 18 years old [and has a high school diploma or its equivalent or is at least 19 years
old but under the age of 25 years] may not take a driver skills examination or driver road
examination for a [provisional] DRIVER’S license:
(i) Sooner than the later of:
1. 3 months following the date that the individual first
obtains the learner’s instructional permit; or
2. 9 months following the most recent date the individual
was convicted of, or granted probation before judgment for, a moving violation;
(ii) Until after successful completion of:
1. A standard driver education program approved under
Subtitle 5 of this title, consisting of at least 30 hours of classroom instruction and at least
6 hours of highway driving instruction; and
2. At least 60 hours, 10 hours of which must occur during the
period beginning 30 minutes before sunset and ending 30 minutes after sunrise, of
behind–the–wheel driving practice supervised by an individual who:
A. Holds a valid driver’s license;
B. Is at least 21 years old; and
C. Has been licensed to drive for at least 3 years; and
(iii) Unless the individual submits, in accordance with the
Administration’s regulations, a completed skills log book signed by each supervising driver
who certifies that the individual has satisfactorily demonstrated a required skill and has
completed the driving practice requirements under this paragraph.
(4) An individual at least 25 years old who holds a learner’s instructional
permit and has not been convicted of, or granted probation before judgment for, a moving

HOUSE BILL 1338
violation may not take a driver skills examination or driver road examination for a
[provisional] DRIVER’S license:
(i) Sooner than 45 days following the date that the individual first
obtains the learner’s instructional permit;
(ii) Until after successful completion of:
1. A standard driver education program approved under
Subtitle 5 of this title, consisting of at least 30 hours of classroom instruction and at least
6 hours of highway driving instruction; and
2. At least 14 hours, 3 hours of which must occur during the
period beginning 30 minutes before sunset and ending 30 minutes after sunrise, of
behind–the–wheel driving practice supervised by an individual who:
A. Holds a valid driver’s license;
B. Is at least 21 years old; and
C. Has been licensed to drive for at least 3 years; and
(iii) Unless the individual submits, in accordance with the
Administration’s regulations, a completed skills log book signed by each supervising driver
who certifies that the individual has satisfactorily demonstrated a required skill and has
completed the driving practice requirements under this paragraph.
(5) An individual at least 25 years old who holds a learner’s instructional
permit and has been convicted of, or granted probation before judgment for, at least one
moving violation may not take a driver skills examination or driver road examination for a
[provisional] DRIVER’S license:
(i) Sooner than 9 months following the most recent date the
individual was convicted of, or granted probation before judgment for, a moving violation;
(ii) Until after successful completion of:
1. A standard driver education program approved under
Subtitle 5 of this title, consisting of at least 30 hours of classroom instruction and at least
6 hours of highway driving instruction; and
2. At least 14 hours, 3 hours of which must occur during the
period beginning 30 minutes before sunset and ending 30 minutes after sunrise, of
behind–the–wheel driving practice supervised by an individual who:
A. Holds a valid driver’s license;

HOUSE BILL 1338 5
B. Is at least 21 years old; and
C. Has been licensed to drive for at least 3 years; and
(iii) Unless the individual submits, in accordance with the
Administration’s regulations, a completed skills log book signed by each supervising driver
who certifies that the individual has satisfactorily demonstrated a required skill and has
completed the driving practice requirements under this paragraph.
(6) A learner’s instructional permit issued to an individual described in
paragraph (1) of this subsection expires 2 years after the date of issuance.
16–111.
(a) This section applies to an applicant who:
(1) Holds a learner’s instructional permit under § 16–105(d) of this subtitle;
or
(2) Qualifies for a provisional license under subsection (e) of this section.
(b) An applicant is entitled to receive a provisional license if the applicant:
(1) Meets the [minimum age required] AGE REQUIREMENTS under §
16–103(c)(2) of this subtitle;
(2) Satisfies the learner’s instructional permit requirements under [§
16–105(d)(2), (3), (4), or (5)] § 16–105(D)(2) of this subtitle;
(3) Passes a driver skills or driver road examination administered under
this subtitle;
(4) Surrenders any learner’s instructional permit issued to the applicant;
and
(5) Pays the fee established under this subtitle.
(c) A provisional license shall be clearly identifiable as a provisional license.
(d) (1) An individual who holds a provisional license may not receive a
DRIVER’S license [sooner than 18 months following] BEFORE the later of:
(i) The date the individual [first obtains the provisional license]
TURNS 18 YEARS OF AGE;

HOUSE BILL 1338
(ii) [The] 18 MONTHS FOLLOWING THE date the individual is
convicted of, or granted probation before judgment under § 6–220 of the Criminal Procedure
Article for:
1. A [moving] violation OF § 21–902 OF THIS ARTICLE; or
2. A violation of a provisional driver’s license restriction
under [§ 16–113(i)] § 16–113(J) of this subtitle; or
(iii) [The] 18 MONTHS FOLLOWING THE date of restoration of an
individual’s provisional driver’s license or driving privilege that has been suspended,
revoked, or canceled for any reason.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subtitle, the
Administration may issue a license to an individual who was otherwise eligible to receive
a license at the time a moving violation was committed.
(e) (1) [Notwithstanding subsection (d) of this section or any other provision
of this subtitle, the] THE Administration may issue a provisional license to an individual
WHO IS UNDER THE AGE OF 18 YEARS AND IS OTHERWISE ELIGIBLE FOR A
PROVISIONAL LICENSE AND who has been licensed to drive in another state or country,
or by the armed forces [for less than 18 months].
[(2) If an individual has been licensed for:
(i) Less than 6 months, the individual shall hold the provisional
license for at least 18 months before being eligible for a license under § 16–111.1 of this
subtitle;
(ii) 6 months, but less than 12 months, the individual shall hold the
provisional license for at least 12 months before being eligible for a license under §
16–111.1 of this subtitle as long as the individual has not committed an offense as defined
in § 16–213(a) of this title during that period; or
(iii) 12 months, but less than 18 months, the individual shall hold the
provisional license for at least 6 months before being eligible for a license under § 16–111.1
of this subtitle as long as the individual has not committed an offense as defined in §
16–213(a) of this title during that period.]
(2) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, AN INDIVIDUAL
WHO OBTAINS A PROVISIONAL LICENSE UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY OBTAIN A
DRIVER’S LICENSE ON OR AFTER THE DATE THE INDIVIDUAL TURNS 18 YEARS OF
AGE.
(3) An individual who commits an offense as defined in § 16–213(a) of this
title while holding a provisional license issued under this subsection is subject to[:

HOUSE BILL 1338 7
(i) The waiting periods under subsection (d)(1)(ii) of this section
before qualifying for a license under § 16–111.1 of this subtitle; and
(ii) Other] sanctions applicable to a holder of a provisional license
under this article.
(4) [Notwithstanding § 16–103(c)(3) of this subtitle, the] THE
Administration may issue a license under § 16–111.1 of this subtitle without issuing a
learner’s instructional permit or a provisional license if the individual has been licensed to
drive in another state or country, or by the armed forces, [for at least 18 months] IS AT
LEAST 18 YEARS OF AGE, AND OTHERWISE QUALIFIES FOR A DRIVER’S LICENSE.
(f) A provisional license is subject to the expiration and renewal requirements of
§ 16–115 of this subtitle.
16–111.1.
(a) An applicant is entitled to receive the driver’s license applied for if the
applicant:
(1) Passes the examination provided for in this subtitle;
(2) Surrenders the last learner’s instructional permit issued to him, if any;
and
(3) Pays the fees provided for by this subtitle.
(b) (1) This subsection applies to an applicant who holds a provisional license
under § 16–111 of this subtitle.
(2) An applicant is entitled to receive a license if the applicant:
(i) Meets the minimum age required under § 16–103(c)(3) of this
subtitle;
(ii) Satisfies the provisional license requirements under § 16–111(d)
or (e) of this subtitle;
(iii) Surrenders any provisional license issued to the applicant; and
(iv) Pays the fee established under this subtitle.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.